Wyoming, session 2025, HB0111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-5-1101 is amended to read:

31-5-1101. Duty to stop vehicle where accident
involves death or personal injuries; penalties.

HB0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0390
(a) The driver of any vehicle who is knowingly
involved in an accident resulting that results in bodily
injury, to serious bodily injury or the death of any person
shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the
accident or as close thereto as possible, but and shall
then forthwith immediately return to and in every event
shall remain at the scene of the accident until he has
fulfilled the requirements of W.S. 31-5-1103. Every stop
shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is
necessary.

(b) Any person failing to stop or to comply with
subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction:, be
imprisoned

(i) Be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to
imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, fined not more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if the
accident resulted in bodily injury as defined in W.S.
6-1-104(a)(i);

(ii) Be guilty of a felony and subject to
imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, fined not
HB0111

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0390
more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or both, if
the accident resulted in serious bodily injury as defined
in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(x) or death.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all motor vehicle
accidents occurring on and after the effective date of this
act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0111